Arkansas, session 2025, HB1503.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 14, Chapter 56, Subchapter 2, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
14-56-205. Accessory dwelling units - Definitions.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Accessory dwelling unit" means a self-contained and
independently accessed living unit on the same parcel as a single-family
dwelling of greater square footage that includes its own cooking, sleeping,
and sanitation facilities and complies with or is otherwise exempt from any
applicable regulatory requirements;
(2) "By right" means the ability to be approved without
requiring:
(A) A public hearing;
(B) A variance, conditional use permit, special permit, or
special exception; or
*SSS115*
03-04-2025 10:10:13 SSS115

As Engrossed: H3/4/25 HB1503
(C) Other discretionary zoning action other than a
determination that a site plan conforms with applicable regulatory
requirements;
(3) "Gross floor area" means the interior habitable area of a
single-family dwelling or an accessory dwelling unit;
(4)(A) "Regulatory requirements" means the requirements
determined by a municipality to be necessary for approval of plans, permits,
or applications under this section.
(B) "Regulatory requirements" includes:
(i) The Arkansas Fire Prevention Code as adopted by
the State Fire Marshal;
(ii) Any locally adopted ordinances and amendments
to the ordinances;
(iii) Applicable zoning ordinances and conditions;
(iv) Design standards; and
(v) Other state and local laws, rules, and
ordinances applicable to the plan, permit, or application in question;
(5) "Short-term rental" means an individually or collectively
owned single-family house or single-family dwelling unit or a unit or group
of units in a condominium, cooperative, timeshare, or owner-occupied
residential home that is offered for a fee for thirty (30) days or less; and
(6) "Single-family dwelling" means a building with one (1) or
more rooms designed for residential living purposes by one (1) household that
is detached from any other dwelling unit.
(b)(1) Except as provided in this section, a municipality shall not
adopt a policy, regulation, or ordinance that restricts, prohibits, or
otherwise regulates the use of at least one (1) accessory dwelling unit by
right on a lot or parcel that contains a single-family dwelling.
(2) An accessory dwelling unit may be attached, detached, or
internal to the single-family dwelling on a lot or parcel.
(3) If the accessory dwelling unit is detached from or attached
to the single-family dwelling, it shall not be more than seventy-five percent
(75%) of the gross floor area of the single-family dwelling or one thousand
square feet (1,000 sq. ft.), whichever is less.
(c) A municipality shall not:
(1) Require that a lot or parcel have additional parking to
03-04-2025 10:10:13 SSS115

As Engrossed: H3/4/25 HB1503
accommodate an accessory dwelling unit or require fees in lieu of additional
parking;
(2) Require that an accessory dwelling unit match the exterior
design, roof pitch, or finishing materials of the single-family dwelling;
(3) Require that the single-family dwelling or the accessory
dwelling unit be occupied by the owner;
(4) Require a familial, marital, or employment relationship
between the occupants of the single-family dwelling and the occupants of the
accessory dwelling unit;
(5) Assess development impact fees on the construction of an
accessory dwelling unit in excess of two hundred fifty dollars ($250);
(6) Require improvements to public streets or sidewalks as a
condition of permitting an accessory dwelling unit, except as necessary to
reconstruct or repair a public street or sidewalk that is disturbed as a
result of the construction of the accessory dwelling unit;
(7) Set maximum building heights, minimum setback requirements,
minimum lot sizes, maximum lot coverages, or minimum building frontages for
accessory dwelling units that are more restrictive than those for the single-
family dwelling on the lot;
(8) Impose more onerous development standards on an accessory
dwelling unit beyond those set forth in this section;
(9)(A) Require a restrictive covenant concerning an accessory
dwelling unit on a parcel zoned for residential use by a single-family
dwelling.
(B)(i) Subdivision (c)(9)(A) of this section does not
prohibit restrictive covenants concerning accessory dwelling units entered
into between private parties.
(ii) Notwithstanding subdivision (c)(9)(B)(i) of
this section, a municipality shall not condition a permit, license, or use of
an accessory dwelling unit on the adoption or implementation of a restrictive
covenant entered into between private parties; or
(10) Require separate water and sewer from the primary
structure.
(d) This section does not prohibit a municipality from regulating
short-term rentals.
(e)(1)(A) A municipality may require a fee for reviewing applications
03-04-2025 10:10:13 SSS115

As Engrossed: H3/4/25 HB1503
to create accessory dwelling units.
(B) The application fee shall not exceed two hundred fifty
dollars ($250) for each accessory dwelling unit.
(2) Subdivision (e)(1) of this section does not prohibit a
municipality from requiring its usual building fees in addition to the
application fee.
(f) A policy, regulation, or ordinance in effect on or after January
1, 2026, that applies to an accessory dwelling unit and does not comply with
this section is invalid to the extent of its conflict with this section.
(g) A municipality may require an accessory dwelling unit to have:
(1) A will-serve letter from both a municipal water system and a municipal
sewer system; or
(2) Approval from the Department of Health where a municipal
water service or municipal sewer service is not available.
(h) This section does not:
(1) Supersede applicable regulatory requirements; or
(2) Prohibit a municipality from adopting a policy, regulation,
or ordinance that is more permissive than the provisions under this section.

/s/Clowney
















03-04-2025 10:10:13 SSS115